Utah statutes.
17B-1-1402.   Board of trustees of a basic local district.
(1)  As specified in a petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a) or (b) or a
resolution under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c) or (d), the members of a board of
trustees of a basic local district may be:
(a) (i)  elected by registered voters; or
(ii)  appointed by the responsible body, as defined in Section 17B-1-201; or
(b)  if the area of the local district contains less than one residential
dwelling unit per 50 acres of land at the time the resolution is adopted or
the petition is filed, elected by the owners of real property within the local
district based on:
(i)  the amount of acreage owned by property owners;
(ii)  the assessed value of property owned by property owners; or
(iii)  water rights:
(A)  relating to the real property within the local district;
(B)  that the real property owner:
(I)  owns; or
(II)  has transferred to the local district.
(2)  A petition under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a) or (b) and a resolution under
Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c) or (d) may provide for a transition from one or
more methods of election or appointment under Subsection (1) to one or more
other methods of election or appointment based upon milestones or events that
the petition or resolution identifies.
